New York, session 2025-2026, S249.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 69-l of the general business law is amended by 2 adding four new subdivisions 6, 7, 8 and 9 to read as follows: 3 6. "Alarm system" means a system installed to detect intrusion, break- 4 in, movement, sound or fire. 5 7. "False alarm" means the activation of any alarm system that results 6 in a request for police or fire or other emergency for which the 7 responding public safety agency finds no evidence of criminal activity, 8 fire, or emergency. 9 8. "Municipality" means a county, town, city or village. 10 9. "Alarm system company" means a company licensed to engage in the 11 business of installing, servicing, or maintaining security or fire alarm 12 systems pursuant to this article. 13 § 2. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 14 69-vvv to read as follows: 15 § 69-vvv. Fines for false alarms. 1. Notwithstanding any other 16 provision of law, a municipality may enact, adopt or enforce any ordi- 17 nance, resolution or regulation requiring any alarm system company to 18 pay for or be responsible for any fines, fees or other penalties rela- 19 tive to false alarms only when the false alarm is attributed to a defi- 20 ciency in the alarm system or an error of the alarm system company or 21 central station. Nothing in this section shall prevent a municipality 22 from imposing any fine, fee or other penalties for a false alarm when EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00393-01-5 S. 249 2 1 such false alarm is attributable to, or caused by, the property owner, 2 lessee, occupant or other person or persons. 3 2. An alarm company operator or an alarm agent shall not be liable for 4 civil penalties and fines assessed or imposed by a municipality for 5 false alarms not attributed to alarm company operator error, improper 6 installation of the alarm system by an alarm agent or an alarm company 7 operator, defective equipment provided or installed by an alarm agent or 8 an alarm company operator, defective equipment leased by an alarm compa- 9 ny operator, or equipment that was not deficient upon installation or 10 provision for use to the end-user but resulted in a deficiency due to 11 normal wear and tear. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.